Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General
§ 21-17-114.
Scholarship fund for students planning teaching careers authorized; eligibility; rulemaking authority granted.

The board of trustees is authorized to establish a tuition scholarship fund for students planning teaching careers. The purpose of this tuition scholarship fund is to encourage Wyoming students demonstrating superior academic achievement to pursue careers in teaching within the state of Wyoming. Each year the board may award scholarships to sixteen (16) Wyoming high school graduates covering five hundred dollars ($500.00) per semester of the cost of tuition at the university or any community college in the state who major in education. No student is eligible to apply for a scholarship under this section unless the student or his mother, father or lawful guardian is a resident of Wyoming and has been a resident of Wyoming for at least five (5) years. Scholarships under this section shall be in addition to any Hathaway scholarship awarded a student under W.S.

21-16-1301

et seq., but shall be considered for purposes of calculating unmet financial need for Hathaway need based scholarships.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 71, § 2.

The board shall promulgate university regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including procedures for application and selection of recipients.

No student shall be awarded a scholarship under this section to attend more than ten (10) semesters of which no more than five (5) semesters shall be at a community college.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 145, § 1; 1995, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 36, § 2.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), substituted “five hundred dollars ($500.00) per semester of the cost” for “costs” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 6, states: “The scholarships provided under this act shall begin for students graduating from an eligible high school or a home-based educational program or receiving a GED after April 1, 2006 and shall be provided beginning with the fall semester 2006.”

§ 21-17-115.
University technology transfer center program.

The University of Wyoming may operate a technology transfer center and provide training to Wyoming county and municipality employees regarding current trends in transportation technology. The funding of the program shall be administered by the Wyoming department of transportation. The cost of the program shall be provided by each of the following contributing a minimum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) each regardless of any contribution from the federal government or other nonstate sources, or up to a maximum of thirty-one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($31,250.00) each provided the federal government or other nonstate sources contribute an amount equal to the total monies provided by the following as specified:

Wyoming department of transportation from available funds;

Counties as provided in W.S. 24-2-110(c)(i);

Cities and towns as provided in W.S. 39-17-111(d)(iii)(A);

University of Wyoming from available funds.

The university shall annually certify the cost of the state’s share of the program to the transportation commission which shall transfer the amounts specified in W.S. 24-2-110(c)(i) and 39-17-111(d)(iii)(A) to the university to be used for funding the program.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 164, §§ 1, 3; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 6, § 2; 1994, ch. 13, § 1; 1996, ch. 19, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2001, ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 42, § 2, repealed Laws 1989, ch. 164, § 3, as amended by Laws 1992, ch. 6, § 1, as amended by Laws 1996, ch. 19, § 1, which had repealed this section effective July 1, 2001.

§ 21-17-116.
Course in field of advanced practice registered nurse in psychiatry; authority to offer; contracts with students; repayment of funds expended; deposit of repayments.

In addition to other powers heretofore granted to the trustees of the University of Wyoming, the board may offer and provide, in whole or in part at the university or in whole or in part at other institutions, universities or colleges within or without the state, a course of training and education in the field of nursing for advanced practice registered nurses in psychiatry.

To accomplish the purposes of this section and in order that degrees in advanced practice registered nurse in psychiatry may be awarded by the university, the board of trustees may enter into contracts with other institutions, universities or colleges within or without the state that maintain schools for the training and education of students in advanced practice registered nurse with a specialty in psychiatry and to expend its funds in connection therewith.

Students desiring to avail themselves of the opportunities under this section, before enrolling for the courses, shall be approved by the president of the university acting with the advice of the state board of nursing. No student shall be approved by the president unless the student has obtained not less than a baccalaureate degree as a registered nurse. Preference under this section shall be given to applicants who individually or whose spouse, parent or legal guardian meets the requirements of W.S. 21-17-105(d)(i) through (v).

In addition to the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, before expending any funds the board of trustees shall obtain an agreement from each student whereby the student agrees to authorize the state of Wyoming to pay not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each academic semester, or not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) for each summer session, the student is enrolled as a full-time student in an approved course of study as determined by any contract between the state of Wyoming and the school of nursing providing that education. Students enrolled on a part-time basis during an academic semester may agree to receive payments reduced proportionally based upon the number of credit hours for which the student is enrolled for that semester, where nine (9) credit hours constitutes a full-time student. The student shall agree either to:

Actively engage in professional practice as an advanced practice registered nurse in psychiatry in Wyoming for up to one (1) year for each academic year of full-time attendance for which payments under this section are made, but not to exceed a total of three (3) years, as the board requires. Qualified work shall be granted on a proportional basis; or

Repay all amounts expended by the state of Wyoming under this subsection on the student’s education, together with interest which shall begin accruing after the student’s residency but in no event later than four (4) years after the student enters into an agreement, upon terms specified by the board. However, interest shall begin to accrue if the board finds that the student has withdrawn from nursing school or a clinical program or is otherwise not making satisfactory progress toward completion of the degree or program. Money expended under this subsection shall accrue at an annual interest rate equal to that charged for federal Stafford loans at the time interest begins to accrue, which rate shall be adjusted annually to match the federal Stafford loan rate. In no event shall the interest rate be greater than eight percent (8%).

Upon recommendation of the president of the university, the board of trustees may relieve a student of the obligation to repay amounts expended under subsection (d) of this section, in whole or in part, where repayment would cause undue hardship. The university shall annually report the number of students relieved from repayment under this paragraph to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than October 1.

Any amounts paid by advanced practice registered nurse students in psychiatry in accordance with the contractual arrangements authorized under this section effective July 1, 2008, and thereafter, shall be deposited into a special fund designated as the advanced practice registered nurse in psychiatry student fund, maintained and separately accounted for by the University of Wyoming, which fund shall be used solely for payments under subsection (d) of this section. On or before October 1 of each year, the university shall submit a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee on expenditures from the fund during the prior fiscal year.

For purposes of this section:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means as defined in W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i);

“Enrolled as a full-time student” means enrolled in and attending not less than nine (9) credit hours per academic semester of approved studies, or as determined by the approved program for summer sessions.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 19, § 3; 2019 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d)(i), substituted "three (3) years" for "two (2) years."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 19, § 1 and Laws 2006, ch. 69, § 1, both created a §

21-17-116

. The section added by ch. 69 has been redesignated as §

21-17-117

by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 111 § 2, provides: "This act shall only apply to agreements entered into under W.S. 21-17-116(d), as amended by this act, on or after July 1, 2019."

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 19, § 2, appropriates from the general fund to the University of Wyoming four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($425,000.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2006, to implement the purposes appropriates under this section shall be used to pay the educational stipends authorized under W.S. 21 17 116(d) for the equivalent of not more than six (6) full-time students in each year of a two (2) year advanced practice registered nurse in psychiatry program and administrative expenses of the University of Wyoming in administering the program authorized by this act.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 21-17-117.
School of energy resources; creation authorized; University of Wyoming energy resources council established; reports; budget submittal.

Subject to legislative appropriation and subject to paragraph (c)(iv) of this section, the University of Wyoming shall operate the school of energy resources.

The school of energy resources shall have the following objectives:

To provide nationally competitive undergraduate and graduate instruction in energy related disciplines, particularly those of importance to develop Wyoming’s energy resources;

To advance the state-of-the-art in Wyoming energy related science, technology and economics research; and

To support scientific and engineering outreach through dissemination of information to Wyoming’s energy industries, companies, community colleges and governmental agencies.

The school of energy resources shall:

Establish relationships with Wyoming energy companies and coordinate with other energy industry organizations to sustain and optimize the development of Wyoming’s energy portfolio. For the purposes of this section, Wyoming’s energy portfolio includes both nonrenewable and renewable resources;

Establish relationships with the Wyoming community colleges creating local programs to enrich students’ education in the Wyoming energy industry operations;

Maintain flexibility in its focus and structure to be capable of responding to the changing needs of Wyoming’s energy industries with regard to instruction, research and outreach;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, develop and submit a budget for the school for approval by the energy resources council and then shall submit for review in accordance with W.S.

9-2-1010

through

9-2-1014

. The school of energy resources shall submit its budget to the governor after approval by the energy resources council created in subsection (e) of this section. The school of energy resources shall submit a copy of its budget for informational purposes to the university’s board of trustees.

Except as provided in paragraph (c)(iv) of this section, the university’s board of trustees shall establish the structure and policies for operation of the school of energy resources consistent with this section, and shall engage as many academic departments and colleges as possible in support of the school.

The University of Wyoming energy resources council is created and shall provide direction to the school of energy resources regarding identifying and prioritizing issues which should be targeted for research and outreach. The University of Wyoming energy resources council shall consist of eleven (11) members, including the president of the university and the director of the Ruckleshaus institute of environment and natural resources, both of whom are ex officio nonvoting members. One (1) member of the house of representatives shall be appointed by the speaker of the house and one (1) member of the senate shall be appointed by the president of the senate. Each appointed legislative member shall serve a two (2) year term. The remaining seven (7) members shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years, except that for the initial appointments two (2) members shall be appointed for one (1) year and two (2) members shall be appointed for two (2) years. These seven (7) members shall represent to the greatest extent practicable the diverse components of Wyoming’s energy industries, and shall be appointed by the governor and approved with the advice and consent of the senate, in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

. The council shall select a chairman and vice-chairman from among its members.

The university shall report annually, not later than October 1, to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee, the joint appropriations committee and the joint education interim committee regarding all revenues to and expenditures by the school of energy resources during the preceding fiscal year, any budget prepared and submitted under paragraph (c)(iv) of this section, accomplishments of the school of energy resources and its benefits to Wyoming’s energy economy.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 69, § 1; 2021 ch. 132, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to clean coal research task force, see §

21-17-121

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added “; budget submittal” in the section heading; added “and subject to paragraph (c)(iv) of this section” in (a); added (c)(iv); in (d), added “Except as provided in paragraph (c)(iv) of this section,” and made a related change; in (f), “ deleted “interim” following “joint appropriations” and added “any budget prepared and submitted under paragraph (c)(iv) of this section.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 19, § 1 and Laws 2006, ch. 69, § 1, both created a §

21-17-116

. The section added by ch. 19 has been redesignated as §

21-17-117

by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Laws 2009, ch. 57, § 5 provides:

“(a) Any funds remaining from the appropriation provided in 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 186, Section 3(b), as amended by 2008 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 48, Section 325(b) are hereby reappropriated to the account created under W.S.

39-14-802

for the purpose of clean coal technology research.

“(b) Any funds remaining under the appropriation provided in 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 186, Section 3(a) are hereby reappropriated to the governor's office for expenses incurred by the clean coal task force.

“(c) There is appropriated seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500.00) from the general fund to the legislative service office for compensation of legislative members serving on the clean coal task force.

“(d) Funds appropriated under subsections (b) and (c) of this section are appropriated for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. These appropriations shall only be expended for the purpose of staffing the clean coal task force and for expenses incurred by the clean coal task force. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the appropriation under subsection (a) of this section shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall not revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. The appropriations under subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be included in the governor's and the legislative service office's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget requests.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 69, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 21-17-118.
Student support and student financial aid fund; rulemaking authority granted.

The board of trustees is authorized to establish a student support and student financial aid fund for students at the university. The fund shall include those monies collected by the university pursuant to W.S.

31-2-219

and such other gifts, contributions, donations, grants, or other funds provided to the university for purposes of this section. Financial aid funded under this section shall be in addition to any Hathaway scholarship awarded a student under W.S.

21-16-1301

et seq., but shall be considered for purposes of calculating unmet financial need for Hathaway need based scholarships.

The board shall promulgate university regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including procedures for application and selection of recipients of financial aid under this section. Revenues in the fund established under this section shall be used exclusively for student financial aid and for projects and programs that directly support students at the university. The board shall coordinate with the University of Wyoming Alumni Association in the university’s administration of the student support funds and financial aid under this section in accordance with an agreement with that association, or its successor organization.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 213, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 213, § 2, makes this section effective January 1, 2008.

§ 21-17-119.
Authority to offer course in dentistry through contracts with other institutions; contracts with students; repayment of funds expended; deposit of repayments.

In addition to other powers granted to the trustees of the University of Wyoming, the board may offer and provide at other institutions, universities or colleges, a course of training and education in the field of dentistry.

To accomplish the purposes of this section, the board of trustees may enter into contracts with other institutions, universities or colleges outside the state that maintain schools for the training and education of students in dentistry and to expend funds appropriated for this purpose in connection therewith.

In entering into contracts with institutions, the board of trustees shall give preference to institutions that agree to provide students with a training rotation or externship in Wyoming.

Students desiring to avail themselves of the opportunities under this section, before enrolling for such courses and having completed the admissions process into the dental education program at a school of dentistry with which the university has an agreement under subsection (a) of this section, must be approved by the president of the university acting with the advice of the state board of dentistry. No student shall be approved by the president unless the student or the student’s father, mother or lawful guardian are residents of Wyoming and have been residents for not less than five (5) years immediately prior thereto.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, before expending any funds the board of trustees shall obtain an agreement from each student whereby the student agrees to:

Authorize the state of Wyoming to pay all or a portion of cost of attendance incurred in his dentistry education as determined by any contract between the state of Wyoming and the school of dentistry providing that education: and

Actively engage in professional practice or other professional pursuits in dentistry in Wyoming for a period of three (3) years; or

Repay all amounts expended by the state of Wyoming under this paragraph on the student's education, together with interest which shall begin accruing after the student's graduation, but in no event later than five (5) years after the student enters into an agreement, upon terms specified by the board. However, interest shall begin to accrue if the board finds that the student has withdrawn from the school of dentistry or is otherwise not making satisfactory progress toward completion of the degree or program. Money expended under this paragraph shall accrue interest at an annual rate equal to that charged for federal Stafford loans at the time interest begins to accrue, which rate shall be adjusted annually to match the federal Stafford loan rate. In no event shall the interest rate be greater than eight percent (8%).

During the time required to practice under subparagraph (i)(A) of this subsection, treat under terms and conditions specified in the agreement Wyoming patients eligible for services under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act or the child and parent health insurance program pursuant to Wyoming Statutes title 35, chapter 25. All contract provisions established under this paragraph shall be developed in consultation with the state board of dentistry and the department of health.

Upon recommendation of the president of the university, the board of trustees may relieve a student of the obligation to repay amounts expended under paragraph (d)(i) of this section, in whole or in part, where repayment would cause undue hardship. The university shall annually report the number of students relieved from repayment under this subsection to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than October 1.

Any amounts other than fees and tuition payments, paid by dentistry students in accordance with the contractual arrangements authorized under this section shall be deposited into a special account designated the Dentistry School Student Account, maintained and separately accounted for by the University of Wyoming, which account may be added to by specific contributions from other sources. The account may be invested, at the discretion of the president of the University of Wyoming, for the production of income. The investment income shall be expended by the University of Wyoming solely for direct assistance for relocation costs associated with practice in Wyoming, fees and materials for dental board examinations, rural training, dislocation, student development and scholarships to dentistry students as authorized by the president of the University of Wyoming and the dean of the college of health sciences. The principal of the fund established shall remain unimpaired and only the income derived therefrom may be collected and expended from year to year. The amount of income expended annually pursuant to this section shall not exceed an amount equal to four percent (4%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the account, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year. Any unexpended income shall remain in the fund. On or before October 1 of each year, the university shall submit a report to the joint appropriations committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee on income to the fund and expenditures from fund earnings during the prior fiscal year.

Tuition and fees received by the University of Wyoming from students participating in the program under this section, shall be separately accounted for by the university. These funds are to be used by the university solely for the support of education and training conducted at the university pursuant to this section and other graduate courses in the college of health sciences. The receipt and expenditure of these funds shall be identified in the university’s biennial budget request.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 103, § 1; 2016 ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “all or a portion of cost of attendance” for “the costs of education” in (e)(i); in (g), inserted “other than fees and tuition payments,” in the first sentence, substituted “University of Wyoming solely for direct assistance for relocation costs associated with practice in Wyoming, fees and materials for dental board examinations, rural training, dislocation, student development” for “University of Wyoming for assistance”, added the fifth sentence, and “joint appropriations committee and the” in the last sentence; and added (h).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 103, § 1, enacted this section as
§

21-17-118

. It has been redesignated as
§

21-17-119

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Laws 2007, ch. 103, § 2, states:

“(a) The University of Wyoming shall, in consultation with the Wyoming board of dentistry and Wyoming professional dental organizations, enter into negotiations with schools of dentistry at Creighton University, the University of Nebraska, and if feasible, other schools of dentistry to pay the cost of education for not to exceed a total of ten (10) seats annually in each class year of dental students under the program created by this act. Thus, when all class levels are full, the program would have a maximum of forty (40) students. The University of Wyoming shall pursue establishing the program to the extent feasible for the fall 2007 entering classes. By October 1, 2007, the university shall provide a progress report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee regarding the implementation of this act.

“(b) There is appropriated from the general fund to the University of Wyoming five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, to implement this act, including expenses related to contract negotiations with dental schools, contract administration, and recruitment of undergraduates into the dental profession. These funds shall be included in the university’s 167 medical education budget and not in its block grant. Unexpended and unobligated funds appropriated under this section shall not revert at the end of the fiscal biennium and shall be used exclusively for the program created by this act during the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2008.”

Laws 2016, ch. 59, § 2 states as follows: “The authority of the University of Wyoming to expend funds from tuition and fees under
W.S.

21-17-109

and

21-17-119

as amended in section 1 of this act shall not be construed to authorize the expenditure of tuition and fees collected prior to the effective date of this act.
This section shall not affect the university's authority to expend funds from those tuitions and fees granted under any other law."

Laws 2016, ch. 59, § 3 states as follows: “For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, funds directed to the University of Wyoming for the support of the medical and dental education programs under
W.S. 21-17-109(g) and
21-17-119(h) are appropriated to the university to be expended as authorized in this act."

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 103, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

§ 21-17-120.
Wyoming conservation corps; creation authorized; reports.

The University of Wyoming shall establish a Wyoming conservation corps (WCC) program patterned after similar conservation corps programs in Utah, Montana and Colorado under which students in those states have performed service on conservation projects in Wyoming. The WCC program shall begin in the summer of 2007. The WCC program shall enter into agreements with state and federal agencies and private industry under which Wyoming students shall perform conservation projects in Wyoming prior to the students performing any work under those agreements. The students who participate in the WCC program may be high school, community college or university students. The students shall receive stipends and education financial awards for their service, as well as the educational and practical benefits of working on valuable conservation projects. The WCC program shall be fully self-sustaining by the end of summer 2009.

The University of Wyoming shall report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee on October 1, 2007, and October 1, 2008, regarding expenditures made under this act, progress made by the WCC program toward financial self-sufficiency and the educational and conservation related benefits of the program.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 137, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 137, § 1, enacted this section as §

21-17-118

. It has been redesignated as §

21-17-120

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Laws 2007, ch. 137, §
2, states:

“(a) There is appropriated from the general fund to the University of Wyoming three hundred twelve thousand dollars ($312,000.00) to be used exclusively for the Wyoming conservation corps as follows:

“(i) Two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000.00) shall be used to match contract funds provided for WCC projects in Wyoming by state and federal agencies and private industry. Each dollar under this paragraph shall be matched by two dollars ($2.00) in funds from contractors;

“(ii) Seventy-two thousand dollars ($72,000.00) shall be used for the administrative costs of the WCC program, but not more than thirty-six thousand dollars ($36,000.00) shall be expended for such costs in any fiscal year. The appropriation under this paragraph shall be available for expenditure only to the extent equal matching funds are secured for the WCC program from other sources.

“(b) The appropriation under subsection (a) of this section shall be separate from the university's block grant, and shall not revert until June 30, 2010.

“(c) Any unexpended and unobligated funds from the appropriation under subsection (a) of this section shall revert to the general fund on June 30, 2010.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 137, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

§ 21-17-121.
Advanced conversion technologies task force; members; compensation; proposals; report. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 57, § 1; 2012, ch. 12, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-17-122.
Accelerated baccalaureate degree in nursing for students with other baccalaureate degrees; contracts with students; repayment of funds expended; deposit of repayments.

Students desiring to participate in the University of Wyoming’s accelerated program leading to a baccalaureate degree in nursing may avail themselves of the financial aid opportunities under this section subject to the following:

Before enrolling in the accelerated baccalaureate in nursing degree program, the student shall be approved by the president of the university acting with the advice of the state board of nursing;

No student shall be approved by the president unless the student has obtained a baccalaureate degree in a discipline other than nursing;

Preference for financial aid under this section shall be given to applicants who individually or through their spouse meet the requirements of W.S. 21-17-105(d).

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), before granting any financial aid under this section the board of trustees shall obtain an agreement from each student whereby the student authorizes the state of Wyoming to pay not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) for financial aid while the student is enrolled in the accelerated nursing degree program. The student shall agree either to:

Actively engage in work as a nurse in Wyoming for two (2) years, as the board of trustees requires. Qualified work shall be granted on a proportional basis; or

Repay all amounts expended by the state of Wyoming under this subsection on the student’s education, together with interest which shall begin accruing upon the student’s graduation, upon terms specified by the board of trustees. However, interest shall begin to accrue if the board finds that the student has withdrawn from the degree program or is otherwise not making satisfactory progress toward completion of the degree program. Money expended under this subsection shall accrue at an annual interest rate equal to that charged for federal Stafford loans at the time interest begins to accrue, which rate shall be adjusted annually to match the federal Stafford loan rate. In no event shall the interest rate be greater than eight percent (8%).

Upon recommendation of the president of the university, the board of trustees may relieve a student of the obligation to repay amounts expended under subsection (b) of this section, in whole or in part, upon a finding that the monies cannot be collected. The university shall annually report the number of students relieved from repayment under this subsection to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than October 1.

Loan repayment options under this section may be deferred for a period not to exceed five (5) years while a loan recipient is serving on full-time active duty with any branch of the military services of the United States.

Any recipient of a loan under this section who fails:

To complete the program for which the loan was provided shall commence cash repayment of the loan no later than forty-five (45) days after the recipient leaves the academic program;

To obtain employment in the targeted occupation for which the person received the education within ninety (90) days after successfully obtaining the appropriate licensure, shall commence cash repayment of the loan within one hundred twenty (120) days after successfully obtaining the appropriate licensure; or

To obtain the appropriate certification within one hundred eighty (180) days after completion of the program shall commence cash repayment of the loan.

Any amounts paid by students in accordance with the contractual arrangements authorized under this section shall be deposited into a special account designated as the accelerated baccalaureate degree in nursing student account, maintained and separately accounted for by the University of Wyoming, which account shall be used solely for payments on behalf of students under subsection (b) of this section. On or before October 1 of each year, the university shall submit a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee on expenditures from the account during the prior fiscal year.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 111, § 1.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 111, § 2 provides: “There is appropriated to the University of Wyoming two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund appropriations made to the Wyoming investment in nursing program pursuant to 2008 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 48, Section 057.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010.
This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of providing loans to not more than six (6) students in each class cohort pursuant to W.S.

21-17-121

[now

21-17-122

] created by this act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012.
This appropriation shall be included in the university's 2011-2012, 167 medical education budget request and not in the block grant.
Any amounts appropriated to the University of Wyoming pursuant to this act shall not be included in the community college commission's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 111, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

§ 21-17-123.
Program for certification of behavioral specialists.

The community college commission shall cooperate with the department of health and the University of Wyoming to develop a course of training and education in the field of professional health services for behavioral specialists with an emphasis in the care of persons dually diagnosed with an intellectual disability and a mental disorder. The course may be offered at the University of Wyoming or one (1) or more community colleges, or both, in collaboration. The program shall be designed to lead to certification as a behavioral health specialist pursuant to W.S. 42-4-120(j) and rules and regulations of the department of health. Certification may also be granted to behavioral specialists who have completed another training program that meets training standards established by the department and who pass a competency evaluation under direction of the department.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 163, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 163, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.